Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.005

Transfer of duties to the department of health.

The powers and duties of the department of social and health services under this chapter shall be performed by the department of health.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 237.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.